District of Columbia statutes.
26-1152.16

No advance payments.

A lender shall not make a covered loan that includes terms under which any periodic payments required under the loan are paid in advance from loan proceeds.

May 7, 2002, D.C. Law 14-132, § 216, 49 DCR 2551
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 216 of Home Loan Protection Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-295, March 1, 2002, 49 DCR 2534).